Utah statutes.
63K-4-102.   Legislative findings -- Purpose -- Short title.

(1)  The Legislature finds that existing and increasing threats of the occurrence of destructive disasters resulting from attack, internal disturbance, natural phenomenon or technological hazard could greatly affect the health, safety and welfare of the people of this state, and it is therefore necessary to grant to the governor of this state and its political subdivisions special emergency disaster authority.

(2)  It is the purpose of this act to assist the governor of this state and its political subdivisions to effectively provide emergency disaster response and recovery assistance in order to protect the lives and property of the people.  This act shall be known and cited as the "Disaster Response and Recovery Act."

